Nebraska, session 109, LB214.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB214 LB214
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-4901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4901 Sections 43-4901 to 43-4903 and sections 2 to 6 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Newborn Safe Haven Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Newborn Safe Haven Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) Newborn infant means a child ninety days old or younger; and
(3) Newborn safety device means a padded and temperature-controlled
device used for the purpose of permitting an individual to anonymously
surrender a newborn infant.
Sec. 3. (1) A newborn safety device shall meet one of the following
requirements:
(a) If the device is located at a hospital, (i) the hospital is
staffed continuously twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week to
provide care to patients and (ii) the device is conspicuous and visible
to hospital staff; or
(b) If the device is located at a fire station, (i) the fire station
is staffed twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week and (ii) the
device is located in a conspicuous area and is visible to staff or the
device is located in an area that is not visible to staff, but is
equipped with a motion sensor and a dual alarm system connected to the
physical location where the device is installed.
(2) A newborn safety device shall be (a) equipped with a dual alarm
system meeting the requirements set forth in this section, (b) visually
inspected once per day, and (c) contain a pouch with informational
literature which shall be available to any individual using the device.
(3) The dual alarm system shall be:
(a) Programmed to sound first when the newborn safety device is
opened by immediately placing a telephone call to a 911 service and
dispatching an emergency medical care provider or a firefighter to the
location of the device, and to sound a second time by immediately placing
-2-

LB214 LB214
2025 2025
a telephone call to a 911 service after movement is detected inside the
device; and
(b) Tested at least once per week.
Sec. 4. (1) The staff at each location where a newborn safety
device is installed shall:
(a) Perform all necessary repairs, complete documentation of all
inspections and tests, and notify the department of any failure that
would require a device to be removed from service; and
(b) Post signage, approved by the department, that clearly
identifies the newborn safety device access portal door and provides both
written and pictorial instruction. The written signage shall be in
English, Spanish, and any other language that is commonly used in the
community. The written and pictorial instruction shall depict how to (i)
open the access portal door, (ii) place the newborn infant inside the
unit, (iii) retrieve the pouch containing informational literature, and
(iv) close the access portal door to engage the lock.
(2) Participation as a location of a newborn safety device shall be
voluntary. The proposal, location selection, and purchase of a newborn
safety device shall be initiated by one or more residents of a local
community or by an authorized drop-off location. Such devices may be
purchased using (a) public funds approved by local boards, councils, or
commissions and (b) philanthropic funds and private donations.
Sec. 5. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate fifteen
thousand dollars to the department for fiscal year 2025-26 for the
purpose of awarding grants to be used for the installation, but not for
the purchase or ongoing operation, of newborn safety devices unless the
lack of such funding jeopardizes the continued use of an installed
device.
Sec. 6. The department shall develop procedures, which shall be
published on its website, to allow an individual to (1) anonymously
provide any medical history information relating to a newborn infant
-3-

LB214 LB214
2025 2025
surrendered under the Newborn Safe Haven Act, (2) reconsider the
surrender of a newborn infant under the act, and (3) undergo paternity
testing for a newborn infant surrendered under the act.
Sec. 7. Section 43-4902, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4902 (1) Subject to available funding, it is the intent of the
Legislature to appropriate sixty-five thousand dollars to the Department
of Health and Human Services for fiscal year 2024-25 and ten thousand
dollars each fiscal year thereafter, to develop, implement, and maintain
a public information program to inform the general public of the Newborn
Safe Haven Act.
(2) Components of the program shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Creation and maintenance of a permanent, interactive website
that provides information to the public about the Newborn Safe Haven Act,
including authorized drop-off locations;
(b) Distribution of literature at statewide locations, as determined
by the department, including the toll-free telephone number of the
National Safe Haven Alliance;
(c) Development of educational, promotional, and informational
materials in print, audio, video, electronic, and other media formats
which includes the toll-free telephone number of the National Safe Haven
Alliance; and
(d) Training to carry out the provisions of the Newborn Safe Haven
Act for emergency care providers, 911 operators, hospital staff,
firefighters, law enforcement officers, or any member of the public
expressing an interest in such training; and .
(e) Public awareness of newborn safety devices.
Sec. 8. Section 43-4903, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4903 (1) No person shall be prosecuted for any crime based solely
upon the act of surrendering a newborn infant pursuant to the Newborn
-4-

LB214 LB214
2025 2025
Safe Haven Act leaving a child ninety days old or younger in the custody
of an employee on duty at: (a) A hospital licensed by the State of
Nebraska; (b) a staffed fire station; (c) a staffed law enforcement
agency; or (d) an emergency care provider.
(2) The hospital, staffed fire station, staffed law enforcement
agency, or emergency care provider shall promptly contact appropriate
authorities to take custody of the child.
Sec. 9. Original sections 43-4901, 43-4902, and 43-4903, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 10. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-